Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 56. Alaska Securities Act.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

For provision relating to applicability of former AS 45.55 to existing proceedings and rights and duties pending before January 1, 2019; to registrations, orders, regulations, statements of policy, interpretative opinions, declaratory rulings, no action determinations, and registration conditions remaining in effect; and to certain offers and sales within one after January 1, 2019, see sec. 32, ch. 65, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For securities, see 3 AAC 08.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this chapter effective January 1, 2019.

Collateral references. —

Martin L. Fried, Taxation of Securities Transactions (Matthew Bender).